Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
ARTICLE 4
UNIFORM PARENTAGE ACT

Editor's note:
This title was repealed and reenacted in 1987. For historical information concerning the repeal and reenactment, see the editor's note following the title heading.

Law reviews:
For article, "Paternity Testing in the Age of DNA", see 19

C
olo. Law. 2061 (1990); for article, "In Vitro Fertilization and Surrogacy: Following the Intent of the Parties", see 24

C
olo. Law. 1535 (1995); for article, "Who's Their Daddy: Navigating Allocation of Parental Responsibilities and Paternity Actions", see 45 Colo. Law. 29 (May 2016); for comment, "Two Legal Mothers: Cementing Parental Rights
for Lesbian Parents in Colorado", see 91 U. Colo. L. Rev. 1247 (2020).

Section

19-4-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Uniform Parentage Act".

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 793, § 1, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-6-101 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-4-102. Parent and child relationship defined.

As used in this article, "parent and child relationship" means the legal relationship existing between a child and his natural or adoptive parents incident to which the law confers or imposes rights, privileges, duties, and obligations. "Parent and child
relationship" includes the mother and child relationship and the father and child relationship.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 793, § 1, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-6-102 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-4-102.5. Terms defined.

Any reference in the statutes, administrative rules, court rules, government policies, common law, and any other provision or source of law in this state to an "acknowledgment of paternity" means an "acknowledgment of parentage", as described in this
section.

Unless the context otherwise requires, any reference in this title 19 to "father" includes a parent of any gender, any reference to "mother" includes a parent of any gender, and any reference to "paternity" is equally applicable to "parentage".

Unless the context otherwise requires, as used in this title 19, "natural parent" means a nonadoptive parent established pursuant to this article 4, whether or not biologically related to the child.

Any reference in the statutes, administrative rules, court rules, government policies, common law, and any other provision or source of law in this state to "spouse", "husband", or "wife", or to the plurals of such terms, are equally applicable to a civil
union partner. Any reference to "marriage", "marital union", "marital status", "married", "unmarried", "wedlock", or any similar term is equally applicable to the status of being in a civil union or not in a civil union.

Source:

L. 2022:
Entire section added, (HB 22-1153), ch. 210, p. 1389, § 3, effective August 10.

19-4-103. Relationship not dependent on marriage.

The parent and child relationship extends equally to every child and to every parent, regardless of the marital status of the parents.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 793, § 1, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-6-103 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-4-104. How parent and child relationship established.

The parent and child relationship may be established between a child and the natural mother by proof of her having given birth to the child or by any other proof specified in this article, between a child and the natural father pursuant to the provisions
of this article, or between a child and an adoptive parent by proof of adoption.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 793, § 1, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-6-104 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-4-105. Presumption of paternity.

A person is presumed to be the natural parent of a child if:

The person and the parent who gave birth to the child are or have been married to each other or are in a civil union pursuant to article 15 of title 14, and the child is born during the marriage or civil union, within three hundred days after the marriage
or civil union is terminated by death, annulment, declaration of invalidity of marriage or civil union, dissolution of marriage or civil union, or divorce, or after a decree of legal separation is entered by a court;

Before the child's birth, the person and the parent who gave birth to the child have attempted to marry each other by a marriage solemnized in apparent compliance with law or attempted to enter into a civil union in apparent compliance with law, although
the attempted marriage or civil union is or could be declared invalid, and:

If the attempted marriage or civil union could be declared invalid only by a court, the child is born during the attempted marriage or civil union or within three hundred days after its termination by death, annulment, declaration of invalidity of marriage
or civil union, dissolution of marriage or civil union, or divorce; or

If the attempted marriage or civil union is invalid without a court order, the child is born within three hundred days after the termination of cohabitation;

After the child's birth, the person and the parent who gave birth to the child have married or entered into a civil union, or attempted to marry each other by a marriage solemnized in apparent compliance with law or enter into a civil union in apparent
compliance with law, although the attempted marriage or civil union is or could be declared invalid, and:

The person has asserted parentage of the child in writing filed with the court or registrar of vital statistics, if such acknowledgment has not previously become a legal finding pursuant to subsection (2)(a.5) of this section;

With the person's consent, the person is named as the child's parent on the child's birth certificate; or

The person is obligated to support the child under a written voluntary promise or by court order or by an administrative order issued pursuant to section 26-13.5-110;

While the child is under the age of majority, the person receives the child into the person's home and openly holds out the child as the person's natural child;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2022.)

The genetic tests or other tests of inherited characteristics have been administered pursuant to section 13-25-126, and the results show that the alleged genetic parent is not excluded as the probable genetic parent and that the probability of the person's
genetic parentage is ninety-seven percent or higher. This subsection (3)(f) does not apply to a donor as defined in section 19-1-103.

A presumption of parentage pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may be rebutted in an appropriate action only by clear and convincing evidence. If two or more conflicting presumptions arise, the presumption that, on the facts, is founded on the
weightier considerations of policy and logic controls. The presumption is rebutted by a court decree establishing parentage of the child by another person other than the parent who gave birth. In determining which of two
or more conflicting presumptions controls, based upon the weightier considerations of policy and logic, the judge or magistrate shall consider all pertinent factors, including but not limited to the following:

The length of time between the proceeding to determine parentage and the time that the presumed parent was placed on notice that the presumed parent might not be the genetic parent, unless the child was conceived through an assisted reproductive procedure;

The length of time during which the presumed parent has assumed the role of the child's parent;

The facts surrounding the presumed parent's discovery of the possibility that the presumed parent was not a genetic parent, unless the child was conceived through an assisted reproductive procedure;

The nature of the existing parent-child relationship;

The child's age;

The child's relationship to any presumed parent or parents;

The extent to which the passage of time reduces the chances of establishing another person's parentage and a child support obligation in favor of the child; and

Any other factors that may affect the equities arising from the disruption of the parent-child relationship between the child and the presumed parent or parents or the chance of other harm to the child.

A person and the parent who gave birth to the child may sign a voluntary acknowledgment of parentage to establish the parentage of the child. A voluntary acknowledgment of parentage may be signed by a parent who gave birth to the child and either:

Another person who is or believes themselves to be a genetic parent; or

Another person who is an intended parent of a child conceived through an assisted reproductive procedure.

A married person or person in a civil union who gives birth to a child may only sign a voluntary acknowledgment of parentage with a person who is not the married person's spouse or civil union partner if the spouse or civil union partner signs a denial
of parentage.

A duly executed voluntary acknowledgment of parentage takes effect upon the filing of the document with the state registrar of vital statistics and may be rescinded on the earlier of:

Sixty days after execution of such acknowledgment; or

On the date of any administrative or judicial proceeding pursuant to this article or any administrative or judicial proceeding concerning the support of a child to which the signatory is a party.

An acknowledgment of parentage may be challenged in court only on the basis of fraud, duress, or mistake of material fact, with the burden of proof upon the challenger. Any legal responsibilities resulting from signing an acknowledgment of parentage,
including child support obligations, continue during any challenge to the finding of parentage, except for good cause shown.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2)(b) and (2)(c) of this section, a voluntary acknowledgment of parentage that complies with this section and section 25-2-112, and is filed with the state registrar of vital statistics, is equivalent to an
adjudication of parentage of the child and confers on the acknowledged parent all rights and duties of a parent. The court shall give full faith and credit to a voluntary acknowledgment of parentage that is effective in
another state, including a federally recognized Indian tribe, if the acknowledgment was in a signed record and otherwise complies with the laws of the other state or federally recognized Indian tribe.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 793, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 89:
(1)(c)(III) amended, p. 1247, § 3, effective April 1.

L. 91:
(1)(f) amended, p. 253, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 97:
(1)(c)(I), (1)(e), and (2) amended, p. 1274, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2003:
(2)(a) amended, p. 1268, § 59, effective July 1.

L. 2008:
(2)(c) amended, p. 1656, § 2, effective August 15.

L. 2022:
Entire section amended, (HB 22-1153), ch. 210, p. 1389, § 4, effective August 10.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in § 19-6-105 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration contained in the 1997 act amending subsections (1)(c)(I), (1)(e), and (2), see section 1 of chapter 236, Session Laws of Colorado 1997.

19-4-105.5. Commencement of proceedings - summons - automatic temporary injunction - enforcement.

All proceedings under this article shall be commenced in the manner provided by the Colorado rules of civil procedure or as otherwise provided in this section or section 26-13.5-104, C.R.S.

Upon commencement of a proceeding under this article by one of the parties, the other parties shall be served in the manner set forth in section 19-4-109 (2), the Colorado rules of civil procedure, or as otherwise provided in section 26-13.5-104, C.R.S.

(2.5) Upon the commencement of a proceeding under this article, each party shall provide to the court, in the manner prescribed by the court, his or her social security number and the social security number of each child who is the subject of the proceeding
under this article.

Proceedings under this article may be commenced prior to the birth of a child.

If a petition is filed by an alleged father or possible father pursuant to the requirements of section 19-5-103.7, the licensed child placement agency involved shall receive notice of the action in the same manner as a party to the action.

A summons issued upon commencement of a proceeding under this article shall contain the following advisements and notice:

That a request for genetic tests shall not prejudice the requesting party in matters concerning allocation of parental responsibilities pursuant to section 14-10-124 (1.5), C.R.S.;

That, if genetic tests are not obtained prior to a legal establishment of paternity and submitted into evidence prior to the entry of the final order establishing paternity, the genetic tests may not be allowed into evidence at a later date; and

That, except in proceedings initiated pursuant to section 19-1-117 or in proceedings initiated by a delegate child support enforcement unit, as defined in section 26-13-102.5 (1), C.R.S., pursuant to article 13 or 13.5 of title 26, C.R.S., or article
5 of title 14, C.R.S., upon personal service of the petition and summons on a respondent or upon waiver and acceptance of service by a respondent, a temporary injunction shall be in effect against both parties:

Enjoining each party from molesting or disturbing the peace of the other party;

Restraining each party from removing a minor child who is the subject of a proceeding under this article from the state without the consent of all other parties or an order of the court modifying the injunction; and

Restraining each party, without at least fourteen days' advance notification and the written consent of all other parties or an order of the court modifying the injunction, from canceling, modifying, terminating, or allowing to lapse for nonpayment of
premiums, a policy of health insurance or life insurance that provides coverage to a minor child who is the subject of the proceeding or that names the minor child as a beneficiary of a policy.

The temporary injunction shall be in effect upon personal service of the petition and summons on a respondent or upon waiver and acceptance of service by a respondent and shall remain in effect for one hundred twenty days after its effective date unless
all parties consent to a modification of the temporary injunction. The court may, upon the motion of a party or upon its own motion, modify the length of time the temporary injunction is in effect to a shorter or
longer period of time as the court deems appropriate.

The provisions of the temporary injunction described in subsection (5) of this section shall be printed on the summons and the petition. A party may apply to the court for further temporary orders, an expanded temporary injunction, or modification or
revocation of the temporary injunction.

For purposes of enforcing the automatic temporary injunction described in paragraph (c) of subsection (5) of this section, if a respondent shows a duly authorized peace officer, as described in section 16-2.5-101, C.R.S., a copy of the petition and summons
filed and issued pursuant to this section, or if a petitioner shows the peace officer a copy of the petition and summons filed and issued pursuant to this section together with a certified copy of the affidavit of service of process
or a certified copy of the waiver and acceptance of service, and the peace officer has cause to believe that a violation of the part of the automatic temporary injunction that enjoins a party from molesting or disturbing the peace
of the other party has occurred, the peace officer shall use every reasonable means to enforce that part of the injunction against the petitioner or respondent, as applicable. A peace officer shall not be held civilly or criminally
liable for his or her actions pursuant to this subsection (7) if the peace officer acts in good faith and without malice.

Source:

L. 94:
Entire section added, p. 1541, § 13, effective May 31.

L. 96:
Entire section amended, p. 612, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2005:
(3) and (4) added, p. 102, § 3, effective July 1; (5) added, p. 378, § 3, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2006:
(5)(b) amended, p. 516, § 2, effective August 7.

L. 2010:
(5) amended and (6) and (7) added, (HB 10-1097), ch. 39, p. 158, § 1, effective August 15.

L. 2011:
(2.5) added, (SB 11-123), ch. 46, p. 119, § 5, effective August 10.

19-4-105.6. Amendment of proceedings - adding children.

In any existing case commenced under this article, if it is alleged that another child has been conceived of the parents named in the existing case, that child shall be added to the existing case if at least one of the presumptions of paternity specified
in section 19-4-105 applies for the purpose of establishing paternity and child support. The caption shall be amended to include the added child.

The party amending the petition pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall serve the amended petition with the new caption upon the other parties in the manner set forth in section 19-4-109 (2), the Colorado rules of civil procedure, or as otherwise
provided in section 26-13.5-104, C.R.S.

(2.5) The party amending the petition pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall provide to the court, in the manner prescribed by the court, the social security number of the added child.

Proceedings under this article may be amended prior to the birth of the child to be added to the proceedings.

If a petition is amended pursuant to the requirements of section 19-5-103.7, the licensed child placement agency involved shall receive notice of the action in the same manner as a party to the action.

A summons issued upon the amendment of a proceeding under this article shall contain the advisements set forth in section 19-4-105.5 (5).

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, in any case where there exists more than one alleged or presumed father for a child pursuant to section 19-4-105, a new case shall be commenced for that child to determine the child's paternity,
establish child support, and address any other related issues. If it is determined that the child is the child of parents named in an existing case, the cases shall be consolidated into the initial action pursuant to rule 42 of
the Colorado rules of civil procedure.

Source:

L. 2008:
Entire section added, p. 1348, § 3, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2011:
(2.5) added, (SB 11-123), ch. 46, p. 120, § 6, effective August 10.

19-4-105.7. Stay of paternity proceedings - criminal charges of allegations of sexual assault. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2013:
Entire section added, (SB 13-227), ch. 353, p. 2060, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2014:
Entire section repealed, (HB 14-1162), ch. 167, p. 587, § 3, effective July 1.

19-4-106. Assisted reproductive procedures.

If, with the consent of another intended parent, an intended parent consents to become pregnant through an assisted reproductive procedure, the intended parent who does not give birth is treated in law as the natural parent of the child conceived. The
consent of both the intended parent who will give birth and the other intended parent must be in writing and signed by each such party, except as provided in subsection (5) of this section. This subsection (1) does not apply to
a child conceived pursuant to a surrogacy agreement pursuant to article 4.5 of this title 19.

A donor is not a parent of a child conceived by means of an assisted reproductive procedure, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2022.)

Failure of the intended parent to sign a consent required by subsection (1) of this section before or after the birth of the child does not preclude a finding that the intended parent is the parent if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that,
prior to the conception of the child, the parent who gave birth and the intended parent had an oral agreement that both would be parents of the child and that the child was conceived through an assisted reproductive procedure.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2022.)

(6.5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, genetic tests may not be ordered and are not admissible to establish a donor as a parent, to challenge the recognition of an intended parent who consented to the assisted reproductive procedure
as a parent, or to challenge a voluntary acknowledgment of parentage that complies with section 19-4-105 where the child was conceived through an assisted reproductive procedure, except to resolve a dispute regarding whether
the child was conceived through an assisted reproductive procedure.

If a marriage or civil union is dissolved before placement of eggs, sperm, or embryos, the former spouse or civil union partner is not a parent of the resulting child unless the former spouse or civil union partner consented in a record that if the assisted
reproductive procedure were to occur after a dissolution of marriage or civil union, the former spouse or civil union partner would be a parent of the child.

The consent of a former spouse or civil union partner to assisted reproduction may be withdrawn by that individual in a record given to the parent who agreed to give birth to a child conceived by an assisted reproductive procedure at any time before placement
of eggs, sperm, or embryos.

If a spouse or civil union partner dies before placement of eggs, sperm, or embryos, the deceased spouse or civil union partner is not a parent of the resulting child unless the deceased spouse or civil union partner consented in a record that if assisted
reproduction were to occur after death, the deceased spouse or civil union partner would be a parent of the child.

This section does not apply to the birth of a child conceived by means of sexual intercourse.

For purposes of this section, "donor" is defined in section 19-1-103.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 794, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 94:
(1) amended, p. 2737, § 366, effective July 1.

L. 2003:
Entire section amended, p. 1269, § 60, effective July 1.

L. 2008:
(1) amended, p. 128, § 9, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2021:
(10) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 734, § 82, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
Entire section amended, (HB 22-1153), ch. 210, p. 1392, § 5, effective August 10.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in § 19-6-106 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-4-107. Determination of father and child relationship - who may bring action - when action may be brought.

A child, his or her natural mother, or a man presumed to be his or her father pursuant to section 19-4-105 (1)(a), (1)(b), or (1)(c) or the state, the state department of human services, or a county department of human or social services, pursuant to
article 13 or 13.5 of title 26 or article 5 of title 14 may bring an action:

At any time for the purpose of declaring the existence of the father and child relationship presumed under section 19-4-105 (1)(a), (1)(b), or (1)(c); or

For the purpose of declaring the nonexistence of the father and child relationship presumed under section 19-4-105 (1)(a), (1)(b), or (1)(c) only if the action is brought within a reasonable time after obtaining knowledge of relevant facts but in no event
later than five years after the child's birth. After the presumption has been rebutted, paternity of the child by another man may be determined in the same action, if he has been made a party.

Any interested party, including the state, the state department of human services, or a county department of human or social services, pursuant to article 13 or 13.5 of title 26 or article 5 of title 14 may bring an action at any time for the purpose
of determining the existence or nonexistence of the father and child relationship presumed pursuant to section 19-4-105 (1)(d), (1)(e), or (1)(f).

An action to determine the existence of the father and child relationship with respect to a child who has no presumed father pursuant to section 19-4-105 may be brought by the state, the state department of human services, a county department of human
or social services, the child, the mother or personal representative of the child, the personal representative or a parent of the mother if the mother has died, a man alleged or alleging himself to be the father, or the personal
representative or a parent of the alleged father if the alleged father has died or is a minor.

Regardless of its terms, an agreement, other than an agreement approved by the court in accordance with section 19-4-114 (2), between an alleged or presumed father and the mother or child does not bar an action under this section.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 794, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 89:
IP(1) and (2) amended, p. 1247, § 4, effective April 1.

L. 94:
IP(1), (2), and (3) amended, p. 2687, § 209, effective July 1.

L. 2018:
IP(1), (2), and (3) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 424, § 64, effective August 8.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-6-107 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

19-4-107.3. When determination of parentage is final - modifications - exceptions.

An order determining parentage pursuant to this article shall be modified or set aside, within the time frames specified in subsection (2) of this section, if genetic test results based on DNA testing, administered in accordance with section 13-25-126,
C.R.S., establish the exclusion of the individual named as the father in the order as the biological parent of the child and the court determines that it is just and proper under the circumstances and in the best interests
of the child.

If the court modifies or sets aside an order determining parentage pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), then the court shall modify the provisions of the order respecting child support for installments accruing subsequent to the filing of
the motion pursuant to section 14-10-122 (6), C.R.S., and may vacate or deem as satisfied, in whole or in part, unpaid child support obligations arising from or based on the order determining parentage. The court shall
not order restitution from the state for any sums paid to or collected by the state for the benefit of the child.

A motion to modify or set aside an order determining parentage pursuant to this section must be filed within two years from the date of the entry of the order.

Repealed.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, neither a determination of parentage nor an order respecting child support shall be modified or set aside pursuant to this section if:

The individual named in the order acknowledged paternity pursuant to section 19-4-105 (1)(c) or (1)(e) knowing that he was not the father of the child;

The child was adopted by the individual named in the order; or

The child was conceived by means of assisted reproduction.

A motion filed pursuant to this section may be brought by the individual named as the father in the order and shall be served in the manner set forth in the Colorado rules of civil procedure upon all other parties. The court shall not modify or set aside
a final order determining parentage pursuant to this section without a hearing.

For purposes of this section, "DNA" means deoxyribonucleic acid.

Source:

L. 2008:
Entire section added, p. 1655, § 1, effective August 15.

Editor's note:
Subsection (2)(b)(II) provided for the repeal of subsection (2)(b), effective July 1, 2011. (See L. 2008, p. 1655.)

19-4-107.5. Required notice of prior civil protection orders to prevent domestic abuse - determination of parent and child relationship.

When filing a proceeding under this article, the filing party shall have a duty to disclose to the court the existence of any prior temporary or permanent civil protection orders to prevent domestic abuse issued pursuant to article 14 of title 13, C.R.S.,
and any emergency protection orders issued pursuant to section 13-14-103, C.R.S., entered against either party by any court within ninety days prior to the filing of the proceeding to determine the parent and child relationship. The
disclosure required pursuant to this section shall address the subject matter of the previous protection orders, including the case number and jurisdiction issuing such orders.

Source:

L. 95:
Entire section added, p. 84, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 99:
Entire section amended, p. 503, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 2004:
Entire section amended, p. 556, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 2005:
Entire section amended, p. 766, § 30, effective June 1.

19-4-108. Statute of limitations.

An action to determine the existence of the father and child relationship may be brought at any time prior to the child's eighteenth birthday by the mother or father of said child, by the child, or by the delegate child support enforcement agency. If,
however, the statute of limitations in effect at the time of the child's birth was less than eighteen years, the delegate child support enforcement agency may bring an action on behalf of the said child at any time prior to the child's
twenty-first birthday. An action brought by a child whose paternity has not been determined may be brought at any time prior to the child's twenty-first birthday. This section and section 19-4-107 do not extend the time within which
a right of inheritance or a right to a succession may be asserted beyond the time provided by law relating to distribution and closing of decedents' estates or to the determination of heirship, or otherwise.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 795, § 1, effective October 1; entire section amended, p. 1587, § 59, effective October 1.

L. 88:
Entire section amended, p. 634, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 89:
Entire section amended, p. 794, § 19, effective July 1.

19-4-109. Jurisdiction - venue.

Without limiting the jurisdiction of any other court, the juvenile court has jurisdiction of an action brought pursuant to this article 4. The juvenile court's jurisdiction includes concurrent jurisdiction with a dependency and neglect court, as set forth
in section 19-3-205 (1), to determine a parent-child legal relationship. A delegate child support enforcement unit also has jurisdiction to establish paternity in noncontested paternities in accordance with the procedures specified
in article 13.5 of title 26. The action may be joined with an action in another court of competent jurisdiction for dissolution of marriage, legal separation, declaration of invalidity of marriage, or support.

(1.5) A paternity determination made by another state, whether established through voluntary acknowledgment, administrative processes, or judicial processes, shall be enforced and otherwise treated in the same manner as a judgment of this state.

A person who has sexual intercourse in this state thereby submits to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state as to an action brought under this article with respect to a child who may have been conceived by that act of intercourse. Upon filing of
the petition, the court shall issue a summons. The hearing shall be set for a day not less than ten days after service is completed or on such later date as the court may order. In addition to any other method provided by rule
or statute, including rule 4 (e) of the Colorado rules of civil procedure, when there is a basis for personal jurisdiction over an individual living outside this state pursuant to section 14-5-201, C.R.S., service may be accomplished
by delivering a copy of the summons, together with a copy of the petition upon which it was issued, to the individual served. Such service may be by private process server or by sending such copies to such individual by certified
mail with proof of actual receipt by such individual.

The action may be brought in the county in which the child or the alleged father resides or is found, or in any county where public assistance was or is being paid on behalf of the child, or, if the father is deceased, in any county in which proceedings
for probate of his estate have been or could be commenced.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 795, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 89:
(1) amended, p. 1247, § 5, effective April 1; (3) amended, p. 794, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 94:
(1.5) added and (2) amended, p. 1541, § 14, effective May 31.

L. 2005:
(2) amended, p. 378, § 4, effective April 22.

L. 2021:
(1) amended, (HB 21-1220), ch. 212, p. 1129, § 5, effective July 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-6-109 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-4-110. Parties.

The child may be made a party to the action. If the child is a minor, the court may appoint a guardian ad litem. The child's mother or father may not represent the child as guardian or otherwise. The court shall make the natural mother, each man presumed
to be the father under section 19-4-105, and each man alleged to be the natural father parties or, if not subject to the jurisdiction of the court, provide notice of the action in a manner prescribed by the court and an opportunity
to be heard. If a man who is alleged to be the natural father is deceased, the court shall make the personal representative of his estate, if one has been appointed, a party. If a personal representative has not been appointed, the
court shall make the deceased man's spouse or an immediate blood relative a party. If a spouse or immediate blood relative is not known or does not exist, the court shall appoint a representative for the alleged natural father who
is deceased. The court may align the parties. When the person to be served has no residence within Colorado and his or her place of residence is not known or when he or she cannot be found within the state after due diligence, service
must be by publication pursuant to rule 4 (g) of the Colorado rules of civil procedure; except that service must be by a single publication and must be completed not less than five days prior to the time set for hearing on paternity
adjudication.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 796, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 93:
Entire section amended, p. 954, § 3, effective May 28.

L. 2006:
Entire section amended, p. 517, § 4, effective August 7.

L. 2016:
Entire section amended, (HB 16-1165), ch. 157, p. 496, § 9, effective January 1, 2017.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-6-110 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.